Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.090

Rules, regulations, and standards.

The department shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules, regulations, and standards with respect to all assisted living facilities and operators thereof to be licensed hereunder as may be designed to further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting safe and adequate care of individuals in assisted living facilities and the sanitary, hygienic and safe conditions of the assisted living facility in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

[ 2012 c 10 s 5; 1985 c 213 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 3; 1957 c 253 s 9.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Savings—Effective date—1985 c 213: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.